Virginia statutes. Title 38.2. Insurance.
Chapter 62. Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Compact.
§ 38.2-6201. Appointment of representative.

The Commissioner of Insurance is hereby appointed as the Commonwealth's representative to the Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Commission.

(2004, c. 761.)

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 2004 acts having been

38.2-6101

.